Hawaii statutes.
§174C-87 Abandonment of wells. When a
well is abandoned, the owner shall fill and seal the well in a manner approved
by the commission. Before abandonment, the owner shall file with the
commission a report showing the owner's name and address; the water use permit
number, if any; the name and address of the well driller who will be employed
to perform the work required for abandonment; the reason for abandonment; a
description of the work to be performed to effect the abandonment; and such
other information as the commission may require. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2; am L
1999, c 197, §12]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next